trunk/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.sv.dix
<pardef n="l/us__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~us / ~usen / ~öss / ~össen -->
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usen</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öss</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>össen</l>     <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="film__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ras__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="godtycke__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~t / # / #; no plural -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bott/en__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~en / ~nen | ~en / ~nar / ~narna -->
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nar</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>narna</l>     <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="djung/el__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~el / ~eln / ~ler / ~lerna -->
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eln</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerna</l>     <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="oro__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~n / # / # ; no plural -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="garage__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~t / ~ / ~n; invariant in indefinite -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>



    <!-- ############################################################## -->
    <!--               START PARADIGMS TO BE CHECKED                    -->
    <!-- ############################################################## -->


<pardef n="saltvatt/en__n">
  <e>       <p><l>net</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="mil__n">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sex__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="prov__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="altare__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aktstycke__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="back/e__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!--PT: backe, backen, backar, backarna-->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l>e</l>          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="film">            <i>film</i><par n="film__n"/></e>
<e lm="miljon">          <i>miljon</i><par n="film__n"/></e>
<e lm="drama">           <i>drama</i><par n="aktstycke__n"/></e>
<e lm="kasino">          <i>kasino</i><par n="aktstycke__n"/></e>
<e lm="konto">           <i>konto</i><par n="aktstycke__n"/></e>
<e lm="mus">             <i>m</i><par n="l/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="meddelande">      <i>meddelande</i><par n="aktstycke__n"/></e>
<e lm="mil">             <i>mil</i><par n="mil__n"/></e>
<e lm="ras">             <i>ras</i><par n="film__n"/></e>
<e lm="saltvatten">      <i>saltvatt</i><par n="saltvatt/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="sex">             <i>sex</i><par n="sex__n"/></e>
<e lm="silke">           <i>silke</i><par n="aktstycke__n"/></e>
<e lm="testamente">      <i>testamente</i><par n="aktstycke__n"/></e>
<e lm="garage">          <i>garage</i><par n="garage__n"/></e>
<e lm="godtycke">        <i>godtycke</i><par n="godtycke__n"/></e>
<e lm="djungel">         <i>djung</i><par n="djung/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="botten">          <i>bott</i><par n="bott/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="råolja">          <i>råolja</i><par n="oro__n"/></e>
<e lm="vodka">           <i>vodka</i><par n="oro__n"/></e>
<e lm="ljusstyrka">      <i>ljusstyrka</i><par n="oro__n"/></e>
<e lm="åska">            <i>åska</i><par n="oro__n"/></e>
<e lm="geografi">        <i>geografi</i><par n="oro__n"/></e>
<e lm="frånvaro" a="is"> <i>frånvaro</i><par n="oro__n"/></e>
<e lm="heder" a="is">    <i>heder</i><par n="oro__n"/></e>
<e lm="kärnenergi" a="is"><i>kärnenergi</i><par n="oro__n"/></e>
<e lm="folkhälsa" a="is"><i>folkhälsa</i><par n="oro__n"/></e>
<e lm="fetma" a="is">    <i>fetma</i><par n="oro__n"/></e>
<e lm="konkurrensförmåga" a="is"><i>konkurrensförmåga</i><par n="oro__n"/></e>
<e lm="terror" a="is">   <i>terror</i><par n="oro__n"/></e>
<e lm="söder" a="is">    <i>söder</i><par n="oro__n"/></e>
<e lm="oförmåga" a="is"> <i>oförmåga</i><par n="oro__n"/></e>
<e lm="propaganda" a="is"><i>propaganda</i><par n="oro__n"/></e>
<e lm="muskel" a="is">   <i>musk</i><par n="djung/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="möbel" a="is">    <i>möb</i><par n="djung/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="arsle" a="is">    <i>arsle</i><par n="aktstycke__n"/></e>
<e lm="backe" a="PT">    <i>back</i><par n="back/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="bälte" a="is">    <i>bälte</i><par n="aktstycke__n"/></e>
<e lm="förutseende" a="is"><i>förutseende</i><par n="aktstycke__n"/></e>
<e lm="invigningsmöte" a="is"><i>invigningsmöte</i><par n="aktstycke__n"/></e>
<e lm="löfte" a="is">    <i>löfte</i><par n="aktstycke__n"/></e>
<e lm="memorandum" a="is"><i>memorandum</i><par n="sex__n"/></e>
<e lm="räcke" a="is">    <i>räcke</i><par n="aktstycke__n"/></e>
<e lm="tidvattensmärke" a="is"><i>tidvattensmärke</i><par n="aktstycke__n"/></e>
<e lm="universum" a="is"><i>universum</i><par n="sex__n"/></e>
<e lm="ände" a="is">     <i>ände</i><par n="aktstycke__n"/></e>
<e lm="avtagande" a="SALDO">       <i>avtagande</i><par n="altare__n"/></e>
<e lm="frälse" a="SALDO">          <i>frälse</i><par n="altare__n"/></e>
<e lm="fäste" a="SALDO">           <i>fäste</i><par n="altare__n"/></e>
<e lm="förklä" a="SALDO">          <i>förklä</i><par n="altare__n"/></e>
<e lm="hejd" a="SALDO">            <i>hejd</i><par n="oro__n"/></e>
<e lm="hänge" a="SALDO">           <i>hänge</i><par n="altare__n"/></e>
<e lm="kläde" a="SALDO">           <i>kläde</i><par n="altare__n"/></e>
<e lm="knyte" a="SALDO">           <i>knyte</i><par n="altare__n"/></e>
<e lm="krypto" a="SALDO">          <i>krypto</i><par n="altare__n"/></e>
<e lm="lerbotten" a="SALDO">       <i>lerbott</i><par n="bott/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="leve" a="SALDO">            <i>leve</i><par n="altare__n"/></e>
<e lm="lyse" a="SALDO">            <i>lyse</i><par n="altare__n"/></e>
<e lm="mode" a="SALDO">            <i>mode</i><par n="altare__n"/></e>
<e lm="sandbotten" a="SALDO">      <i>sandbott</i><par n="bott/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="spänne" a="SALDO">          <i>spänne</i><par n="altare__n"/></e>
<e lm="stenbotten" a="SALDO">      <i>stenbott</i><par n="bott/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="tycke" a="SALDO">           <i>tycke</i><par n="altare__n"/></e>
<e lm="årtusende" a="SALDO">       <i>årtusende</i><par n="altare__n"/></e>
<e lm="örhänge" a="SALDO">         <i>örhänge</i><par n="altare__n"/></e>
<e lm="lagårdsbacke" r="LR" c="domain:lantliv style:fam" a="PT">              <i>lagårdsback</i><par n="back/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="ladugårdsbacke" c="domain:lantliv" a="PT">              <i>ladugårdsback</i><par n="back/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="kyrkbacke" c="domain:lantliv" a="PT">              <i>kyrkback</i><par n="back/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="smycke" a="PT">              <i>smycke</i><par n="aktstycke__n"/></e>
